Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.060

Registration statement—Effective, when.

If no stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under RCW 19.100.120, a registration statement becomes effective at 3:00 P.M. Pacific Standard Time on the afternoon of the fifteenth business day after the filing of the registration statement or the last amendment or at such earlier time as the director determines.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 6.]